Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2306.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Apache county; rural school bus route enhancement and soil stabilization pilot project; matching monies; exemption A. The sum of $665,000 is appropriated from the state highway fund established by section 28-6991, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for distribution to Apache county for the rural school bus route enhancement and soil stabilization pilot project. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section may be spent only if Apache county demonstrates to the department that the county has a commitment of at least $60,000 in matching monies from sources other than this state. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.